Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 336.071 is amended to read:
336.071. (1) As used in this section, “school” means any:
(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school, including a public charter
school; or
(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students.
(2) Every school is  required to have emergency safeguards to protect the safety and
well-being of students and staff at the school. The emergency safeguards must include:
[(1)] (a) [ All schools are required to instruct and  drill students ] Drills and instruction  on
emergency procedures so that [ the] students can respond to  an emergency without confusion or
panic.
(b) Policies and procedures relating to school building security.
(3) When reviewing policies and procedures relating to school building  security, the gov-
erning body for a school shall consider the installation of a panic alarm system that:
(a) Is wireless or consists of wearable panic alarms;
(b) Is capable of  connecting to diverse emergency services technologies to ensure real-
time coordination between multiple emergency services agencies; and
(c) Integrates with local public safety answering points to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile
activations.
(4) The [ emergency procedures shall include ] drills and instruction on emergency procedures
required by this section must be on:
(a) Fires;
(b) Earthquakes, which shall include  tsunami drills and instruction in schools in a tsunami
hazard zone; and
(c) Safety threats.
[(2)(a)] (5)(a) Drills and instruction on fire emergencies shall include routes and methods  of ex-
iting the school building.
(b) Drills and instruction on earthquake emergencies shall include the earthquake  emergency
response procedure known as “drop, cover and hold on.” A school  may drill earthquake emergency
response procedures in addition to “drop, cover and hold on”  when the school determines, based on
evaluation of specific engineering  and structural issues related to a building, that “drop, cover and
Enrolled House Bill 3083 (HB 3083-A) Page 1
hold on” may not be the most effective  earthquake emergency response procedure to prevent or
limit injury or loss of life.
(c) Drills and instruction on tsunami emergencies shall include immediate evacuation after  an
earthquake when appropriate or after a tsunami warning  to protect students against inundation by
tsunamis.
(d) Drills and instruction on safety threats shall include:
(A) Procedures related to  lockdown, lockout, shelter in place and evacuation, including the
procedures described in ORS 339.324; and
(B) Other appropriate actions to take when there is a threat to safety.
[(3)(a)] (6)(a) At least 30 minutes in each school month shall be used to instruct students on the
drills and instruction on  emergency procedures described in subsection [ (1)] (4) of this section.
(b) At least two drills on earthquakes shall be conducted each year.
(c) At least two drills on safety threats shall be conducted each year.
(d) In schools in a tsunami hazard zone, at least three drills on earthquakes and tsunamis  shall
be conducted each year.
[(4)(a)] (7)(a) In addition to the instruction required  under subsection [ (3)] (6) of this section,
schools are encouraged to instruct students, in an  age-appropriate manner, on preparing for and
recovering from events that are:
(A) Described in subsection [ (1)] (4) of this section; and
(B) Natural disasters specific to the  region where the school is located, including any relevant
weather-related events such as flooding, drought or excessive snowfall.
(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the Department of Education shall:
(A) Develop, in  consultation with the Oregon Department of Emergency Management, guidance
that may  be used for the instruction and make the guidance available to [ school districts ] schools ;
and
(B) Provide, when requested, professional development to teachers and administrators relating
to the guidance.
[(5)] (8) All schools shall maintain all exit doors so that the  doors can be opened from the inside
without a key during school hours.
[(6)] (9) Units  of local government and state agencies associated with emergency procedures
training and planning shall:
(a) Review emergency [ procedures ] safeguards proposed by schools; and
(b) Assist schools in the instruction and drilling of students in emergency procedures.
[(7) As used in this section, “school” means any: ]
[(a) Kindergarten through grade 12 public or private school; or ]
[(b) Educational institution having an average daily attendance of 50 or more students. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3083 (HB 3083-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3083 (HB 3083-A) Page 3